Utah statutes.
48-1d-1008.   Appraisal rights.

(1)  An interest holder of a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating entity is entitled to appraisal rights in connection with the transaction if the interest holder would have been entitled to appraisal rights under the entity's organic law in connection with a merger in which the interest of the interest holder was changed, converted, or exchanged unless:

(a)  the organic law permits the organic rules to limit the availability of appraisal rights; and

(b)  the organic rules provide such a limit.

(2)  An interest holder of a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating entity is entitled to contractual appraisal rights in connection with a transaction under this part to the extent provided in:

(a)  the entity's organic rules; or

(b)  the plan.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

